Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law
§ 81-12-169.
Reinstatement of loan prior to foreclosure sale.

The directors of an association may, at any time before an actual sale of property on a foreclosure proceeding previously instituted by the association, reinstate a loan and any savings account securing the same. The effect of such reinstatement shall be to place the association, the borrower, and any other interested person in the same legal position as if no action had been taken, looking to such foreclosure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 50; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 85; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 86; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 86; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 118; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 83; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 85, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-171.
Right of association to deal with successor in interest of real estate securing loan.

In the case of any investment made by an association in a real estate loan where the ownership of the real estate security or any part thereof later becomes vested in a person other than the party or parties originally executing the security instruments, unless there is an agreement in writing to the contrary, an association may, without notice to such party or parties, deal with such successor or successors in interest with reference to said mortgage and the debt thereby secured in the same manner as with such party or parties, and may forbear to sue or may extend time for payment of or otherwise modify the terms of the debt secured thereby, without discharging or in any way affecting the liability of such original party or parties thereunder or upon the debt thereby secured.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 51; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 86; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 87; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 87; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 119; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 84; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 86, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-173.
Right to act to avoid loss.

An association, with the approval of the commissioner, may operate a business, manage or deal in property, or take any other action over whatever period of time may reasonably be necessary to avoid loss on a loan or investment theretofore made or an obligation created in good faith.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 52; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 87; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 88; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 88; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 120; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 85; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-175.
Branch offices.

A branch office is a legally established place of business of the association other than the home office, authorized by the board of directors and approved as provided herein, at which savings accounts and loan payments may be accepted and applications for loans may be received, and at which account books and certificates may be issued and loans may be closed by employees of the association.

Each association shall be operated from the home office. All branch offices shall be subject to direction from the home office.

No association may establish or operate a branch office without authorization of the commissioner. Each application for approval of the establishment and operation of a branch office shall state the proposed location thereof, the need therefor, the functions to be performed therein, the estimated volume of business thereof, the estimated annual expense thereof and the mode of payment therefor, and shall be accompanied by a budget of the association for the current earnings period and for the next succeeding semiannual period, which reflects the estimated additional expense of the maintenance of such a branch office. A resolution adopted by the board of directors of the association authorizing the proposed branch office and specifying the location and manner in which the branch office will be financed shall be submitted with each application. The commissioner may, by regulation, require the application to state other relevant and necessary information. Applications shall be made to the commissioner; and, upon receipt, he shall make an investigation to determine whether the establishment and maintenance of such office will unduly injure any properly conducted existing association or federal association in the community where such branch office is proposed to be established. The provisions of Section 81-12-29 of this chapter shall be followed in processing such application, except that the hearing shall be before the commissioner instead of the board.

No association may change the location of a branch office to a municipality other than that in which it is located without authorization of the commissioner. Each application for approval of change of location of a branch office to another municipality shall state the proposed location thereof, the need therefor, the functions to be performed therein, the estimated volume of business thereof, the estimated annual expense thereof, and the mode of payment therefor, and shall be accompanied by a budget of the association for the current earnings period and for the next succeeding semiannual period, which reflects the estimated additional expense of the maintenance of such proposed change of location of the branch office. A resolution adopted by the board of directors of the association authorizing the proposed change of location of the branch office to another municipality and specifying the location and proposed manner in which such branch office will be financed shall be submitted with each application. The commissioner may, by regulation, require the application to state other relevant and necessary information. Applications shall be made to the commissioner; and, upon receipt, he shall make an investigation to determine whether the establishment and maintenance of such office will unduly injure any properly conducted existing association or federal association in the community to which the location of such branch office is proposed to be changed. The provisions of Section 81-12-29 shall be followed in processing such applications, except that the hearing shall be before the commissioner instead of the board.

No association may change the location of a branch office to another location in the same municipality without authorization by the commissioner. The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the application, prerequisites and requirements. Notice of such proposed change of location shall be given as provided in Section 81-12-29(1). If no protests are filed after such notice, the commissioner may approve such application if it meets the established prerequisites and requirements. If protests are filed, the commissioner, upon reasonable notice to the applying association and its attorney and to the protestants and their attorneys, shall hold a hearing and, based upon his written findings at such hearing, issue a certificate of approval or disapproval.

No branch office in this state may be discontinued or abandoned without the consent in writing of the commissioner first obtained.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 53; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 88; Laws, 1982, 331, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 89; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 89; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 121; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 86; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-176.
Branch offices; additional types of offices.

No association shall, without authorization by the commissioner, establish a savings branch office, loan branch office or a loan processing office. The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the application, prerequisites and requirements for the above types of offices. If no protest is filed after notice has been given as provided in Section 81-12-29(1), the commissioner may approve the application for the above-described limited service branch offices if the established prerequisites and requirements are met. If protests are filed, the commissioner, upon reasonable notice to the applying association and its attorney and to the protestants and their attorneys, shall hold a hearing and, based upon his written findings at such hearing, issue a certificate of approval or disapproval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 331, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 90; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 90; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 122; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 87; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 89, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-177.
Annual report; annual audit; additional reports and examinations; access to books and papers.

On or before the forty-fifth day after the end of an association’s annual accounting period, every association shall make an annual written report to the commissioner, upon a form to be prescribed and/or furnished by the commissioner, of its affairs and operations, which shall include a complete statement of its financial condition, including a statement of income and expense since its last previous similar report, for the twelve (12) months ending on the last day of its accounting period of the previous year. This report shall include a statement of full compliance with this chapter, and such other information as the commissioner shall direct. Every such report shall be verified by the president, managing officer or any other officer designated by the commissioner.

Every association also shall make such other reports as the commissioner may from time to time require, which shall be in such form and filed on such date as he may prescribe and shall be verified in the same manner as the annual report.

The commissioner shall require that every association have its affairs examined and be audited at least once a year. The commissioner shall review such examination and audit within a reasonable time after their completion.

The commissioner shall accept any examination made or any audit caused to be made by a federal home loan bank, the appropriate federal regulatory authority, or by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

The commissioner may, without previous notice, examine or cause an examination to be made into the affairs of an association.

Whenever, in the judgment of the commissioner, the condition of any association renders it necessary or expedient to make any extra examination or audit or to devote any extraordinary attention to its affairs, the commissioner shall cause the same to be done. A full and complete copy of the report of all examinations and audits shall be furnished to the association examined. Such report of examination or audit shall be presented by the president to the board of directors at its next regular or special meeting.

The commissioner is authorized in connection with any examination or audit of any association to cause to be made appraisals of real estate held by the association or securing the association’s assets when specific facts or information with respect to real estate held, secured loans or lending, or when in his opinion the association’s policies, practices, operating results and trends give evidence that an association’s appraisals may be excessive, that lending or investment may be of a marginal nature, that appraisal policies and practices may not conform with generally accepted and established professional standards, or that real estate held by the association or assets secured by real estate are overvalued. In lieu of causing such appraisals to be made, the commissioner may accept any appraisal caused to be made by a federal home loan bank, the appropriate federal regulatory authority, or by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Unless otherwise ordered by the commissioner, appraisal of real estate in connection with any examination or audit pursuant to this section shall be made by a professional appraiser or appraisers selected by the commissioner, and the cost of such appraisal promptly shall be paid by such association directly to such appraiser or appraisers, upon receipt by the association of a statement of such cost bearing the written approval of the commissioner. A copy of the report of such appraisal caused to be made by the commissioner, pursuant to this subsection, shall be furnished to the association within a reasonable time, not to exceed sixty (60) days following the completion of such appraisals, and may be furnished to the insuring agency.

The commissioner or his examiners or auditors shall have free access to all books and papers of an association, a holding company of an association, or a service organization, the principal office of which is located in this state and which is principally owned by one or more thrift institutions, which relate to its business and books and papers kept by any officer, agent or employee, relating to or upon which any record of its business is kept, and may summon witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations in the examination of the directors, officers, agents or employees of any such association, service organization or any other person in relation to its affairs, transactions and conditions, and may require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts or other documents by court order, if not voluntarily produced.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 54; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 89; 331, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 91; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 91; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 123; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 88; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 90, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-178.
Public availability of federal evaluations of banks.

The commissioner shall obtain each year from the appropriate federal financial supervisory agency or agencies the public sections of the written evaluations prepared pursuant to 12 USCS Section 2906 of the Community Reinvestment Act, as amended (12 USCS Section 2901 et seq.), of each state savings association, savings bank, and savings and loan association and each federal savings and loan association located in Mississippi, and each savings and loan holding company that controls any savings association, savings bank or savings and loan association located in Mississippi. Once each year, the commissioner shall publish in some newspaper having a general circulation in the state a statement that the public section of the written evaluation prepared pursuant to 12 USCS Section 2906 of the Community Reinvestment Act, as amended (12 USCS Section 2901 et seq.), of each such savings association, savings bank, savings and loan association and savings and loan holding company is maintained in the office of the commissioner and will be made available for inspection to any person upon request during business hours, and that copies of all or part of any evaluation will be furnished to any person upon request for a reasonable copying fee prescribed by the commissioner.

For the purposes of this section, the term “appropriate federal financial supervisory agency” shall have the same meaning as the definition in 12 USCS Section 2902.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 92; reenacted, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 124; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 89; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-179.
Order of discontinuance of violation; enforcement in chancery court.

If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report made to him, shall find that any association is violating the provisions of its certificate of incorporation or bylaws, or the laws of this state or of the United States, or any lawful order or regulation of the commissioner, he shall, by a formal written order delivered to the association as aforesaid, state any alleged violation, together with a statement of the facts alleged to be such violation, and order discontinuance of such violation and conformance with all requirements of law. Such order shall specify the effective date thereof, which may be immediate or may be at a later date, and such order shall remain in effect until withdrawn by the commissioner or until terminated by a court order. Such order of the commissioner, upon application made on or after the effective date thereof by the commissioner to the chancery court in the county in which the home office of the association is located, shall be enforced ex parte and without notice by an order to comply entered by the court. Such proceedings shall be given precedence over all cases pending in such court, and shall in every way be expedited. Any association affected by such order of the commissioner shall, after receipt thereof, have the right to apply within thirty (30) days to any such court for an immediate hearing and order suspending the order of the commissioner upon such conditions as may be prescribed by the court until such time as the hearing has been completed. The hearing of such application to the court shall be upon such notice to the commissioner as the court shall provide. Whether upon application by the commissioner or by the association, such court shall have power to and shall adjudicate the question and enter the proper order or orders and enforce the same.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 55(1); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 90; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 92; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 93; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 125; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 90; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-181.
Appointment of conservator; powers and privileges; directors, officers and employees to remain; effect on deposits, withdrawals and loans.

If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report made to him, believes that the public interest may be served by the appointment of a conservator, and if he shall find that: (a) the capital of an association is impaired, or (b) the association is concealing any assets, books or records, or (c) the members of such association are in actual danger of loss due to mismanagement, misappropriation of funds, fraud, violation of this chapter, or violation of any lawful rule of the commissioner, or (d) any association is in violation of an order or injunction, as authorized by this section, which has become final in that time to appeal has expired without appeal or a final order entered from which there can be no appeal, the commissioner may appoint a conservator for such association, which may be the commissioner or any other person, and upon such appointment shall apply immediately to the chancery court in the county in which the home office of t he association is located for confirmation of such appointment, and such court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to determine the issues and all related matters. Such proceedings shall be given precedence over other cases pending in such court, and shall in every way be expedited. Such court shall confirm such appointment if it shall find that one or more of such grounds exist, and a certified copy of the order of the court confirming such appointment shall be evidence thereof. Such conservator shall have the power and authority provided in this chapter and such other power and authority as may be expressed in the order of the court. Such conservator shall endeavor promptly to remedy the situations complained of by the commissioner in his application for confirmation of such appointment. Within six (6) months of the date of such appointment, or within twelve (12) months if the court shall extend such period of six (6) months, such association shall be returned to the board of directors thereof and thereafter shall be managed and operated as if no conservator had been appointed, or a receiver shall be appointed as hereinafter provided. If the commissioner or examiner is appointed conservator, he shall receive no additional compensation, but if another person is appointed, then the compensation of the conservator, as determined by the court, shall be paid by the association. A certified copy of the order of the court discharging such conservator and returning such association to the directors thereof shall be sufficient evidence thereof.

Any conservator appointed shall have all the rights, powers and privileges possessed by the officers, board of directors and members of the association and shall have the power, with the approval of the court, to limit or condition withdrawals from the association and to effectuate a system for payment of withdrawals.

The directors and officers shall remain in office and the employees shall remain in their respective positions, but the conservator may remove any director, officer or employee, provided the order of removal of a director or officer shall be approved in writing by the commissioner.

While the association is in the charge of a conservator, members or borrowers of such association shall continue to make payments to the association in accordance with the terms and conditions of their contracts, and the conservator, in his discretion, may permit savings account members or savings account holders to withdraw their accounts from the association pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The conservator shall have power to accept savings accounts and additions to savings accounts, but any such amounts received by the conservator may be segregated if the commissioner shall so order in writing; if so ordered, such amounts shall not be subject to offset and shall not be used to liquidate any indebtedness of such association existing at the time the conservator was appointed for it or any subsequent indebtedness incurred for the purposes of liquidating the indebtedness of any such association existing at the time such conservator was appointed. All expenses of the association during such conservatorship shall be paid by the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 55(2-5); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 91; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 93; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 94; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 126; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 91; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-183.
Appointment of receiver; powers of receiver; directors, officers and attorneys authorized to contest appointment; surrender of charter.

If the commissioner shall find that: (a) the capital of an association is impaired, or (b) the association is concealing any assets, books or records, or (c) the members of such association are in actual danger of loss due to mismanagement, misappropriation of funds, fraud, violation of this chapter, or violation of any lawful rule of the commissioner, or (d) any association is in violation of an order or injunction, as provided in Section 81-12-181 or Section 81-12-183, which has become final in that the time to appeal has expired without appeal or a final order entered from which there can be no appeal, the commissioner may apply immediately to the chancery court in the county in which the home office of the association is located for appointment of a receiver for such association, and such court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to determine the issues and all related matters. The commissioner shall suggest a person for such appointment who may be the commissioner. Such proceedings shall be given precedence over other cases pending in such court, and shall in every way be expedited. Such court shall make such appointment if it shall find that one or more such grounds exist, and a certified copy of the order of the court confirming such appointment shall be evidence thereof. Such receiver shall have all the powers and authority of a conservator plus the power to liquidate, and shall have such other powers and authority as may be expressed in the order of the court. If the commissioner or examiner is appointed receiver, he shall receive no additional compensation, but if another person is appointed, then the compensation of the receiver, as determined by the court, shall be paid from the assets of the association.

The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be tendered appointment as receiver. If it accepts such appointment, it may, nevertheless, make loans on the security of or purchase at public or private sale any part or all of the assets of the association of which it is receiver, provided such loan or purchase is approved by such court.

The procedure in such receivership action shall be in all other respects in accordance with the practice of such court, including all rights of appeal and review. The directors, officers and attorneys of an association in office at the time of the initiation of any proceeding under this or the preceding section are expressly authorized to contest any such proceeding and shall in the discretion of the court be reimbursed for reasonable expenses and attorney’s fees by the association or from its assets. Any court having any such proceeding before it shall in its discretion allow and order paid reasonable expenses and attorney’s fees for such directors, officers and attorneys. The charter of any association which is liquidated by a receiver shall be surrendered to the commissioner on the completion of such liquidation and cancelled by him.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 56; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 92; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 94; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 95; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 127; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 92; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-184.
Supervisory merger.

If it appears to the commissioner that it is in the best interest of the depositors of an association, the general public, and the savings association industry within this state, the commissioner is hereby granted the authority to allow a supervisory merger of an association into another association in lieu of appointing a conservator or a receiver under the provisions of Section 81-12-181 or 81-12-183, provided the board of directors of each association has adopted a voluntary consent resolution authorizing a supervisory merger. The commissioner shall coordinate the supervisory merger with the appropriate federal regulatory authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 431; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 95; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 96; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 128; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 93; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 95, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-185.
Restrictions on appointment of conservator or receiver.

No appointment of a conservator shall be confirmed, and no receiver shall be appointed or private property seized, with respect to an association which is not in an impaired condition, unless the court finds that the alleged wrongdoing cannot be reasonably corrected as provided in this chapter or otherwise as provided by law without appointment of a conservator or receiver.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 57; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 93; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 96; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 97; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 129; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 94; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 96, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-187.
Foreign associations; definition; conditions for doing business in state; injunction against foreign association doing business without approval.

For the purposes of this section, the term “foreign association” shall include any person, firm, company, association, fiduciary, partnership or corporation, by whatever name called, actually engaged in the business of an association, which is not organized under the provisions of this chapter or the laws of the United States as now or hereafter amended, the principal business office of which is located outside the territorial limits of this state.

No foreign association shall do any business of an association within this state or maintain an office in this state for the purpose of doing such business unless an application is made and approval granted as provided herein for the charter of domestic associations. No foreign association shall be granted permission to do business in this state, except upon the same terms, provisions, requirements and conditions as the laws of the state in which the foreign association is incorporated require of a Mississippi association desiring to do business under the laws of the state in which such foreign corporation is organized and created.

The commissioner shall conduct a complete investigation of the applicant at its expense.

The commissioner shall examine and supervise all foreign associations doing any such business in this state in the same manner as he examines and supervises associations of this state, and they shall pay the supervision and examination fee imposed by Section 81-12-193, plus any additional costs as determined by the commissioner. The commissioner in his discretion may rely upon such official examinations, public and private audits, and copies of reports which are supplied to him.

The commissioner hereby is authorized, empowered and directed to obtain an injunction or to take any other action necessary to prevent any foreign association from doing any business of an association in this state without approval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 58(1-5); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 94; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 97; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 98; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 130; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 95; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 97, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-189.
Foreign associations; activities of federal associations and certain foreign associations not constituting doing of business within state; subjectivity to suit.

For the purposes of Section 81-12-187 and this section and any other law of this state prohibiting, limiting, regulating, charging or taxing the doing of business in this state by foreign associations or foreign corporations of any type, any federal association the principal office of which is located outside this state, and any foreign association which is located outside this state, and any foreign association which is subject to state or federal supervision, or both, which by law is subject to periodic examination by such supervisory authority and to a requirement of periodic audit, shall not be considered to be doing business in this state, nor shall any of its intangible properties be deemed to have a business, commercial or actual situs in this state by reason of engaging in any of the following activities:

The purchase, acquisition, holding, sale, assignment, transfer, collecting and enforcement of obligations or any interest therein secured by real estate mortgages or other instruments in the nature of a mortgage, covering real property located in this state, or the foreclosure of such instruments, or the acquisition of title to such property by foreclosure, or otherwise, as a result of default under such instruments, or the holding, protection, rental, maintenance and operation of said property so acquired, or the disposition thereof.

The advertising or solicitation of savings accounts, or the making of any representations with respect thereto in this state through the media of the mail, radio, television, magazines, newspapers or any other media which are published or circulated within this state, provided that such advertising, soliciting or the making of such representations shall be accurately descriptive of the fact and shall conform to the limitations set forth in this chapter regarding associations.

The purchase of a participating interest in loans of associations, subject to such regulations as the commissioner may adopt.

Any foreign association or federal association described in subsection (1) which engages in any of the activities described in paragraph (a) thereof pursuant to the provisions of this section shall in any connection therewith be subject to suit in the courts of this state by this state and the citizens of this state, and service on such association shall be effected by serving the Secretary of State of this state, provided that the provisions of this section shall have no other application to the question of whether any foreign association or federal association is subject to service of process and suit in this state as a result of the transaction of business or other activities in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 58(6, 7); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 95; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 98; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 99; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 131; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 96; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 98, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-191.
Federal associations domiciled in state.

Federal savings associations or federal savings and loan associations, domiciled in the State of Mississippi, incorporated pursuant to the laws of the United States, as now or hereafter amended, are not foreign corporations or foreign associations. Unless otherwise restricted by laws of the United States, the depositors, members and stockholders of federal associations shall possess all of the rights, privileges and benefits, duties and obligations that are now or may hereafter be provided by the laws of this state for depositors, members and stockholders of associations organized under the laws of this state; unless otherwise restricted by the laws of the United States, federal associations shall possess all of the benefits, immunities, exemptions, duties and obligations that are now or may hereafter be provided by the laws of this state for associations organized under the laws of this state. This provision is additional and supplemental to any provision which, by specific reference, is applicable to federal associations and the members thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 59; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 96; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 99; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 100; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 132; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 97; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 99, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-193.
Fees.

The department shall charge and collect for:

Filing articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of incorporation, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) as fixed by the commissioner.

For filing annual reports, the commissioner shall assess every association organized under the laws of this state engaging in the business of an association, and every foreign association qualified to do business in this state under the provisions of Section 81-12-187, in accordance with the following schedule, setting forth the maximum that may be assessed:

Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00).

Every such association whose total assets exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) shall further pay in addition to the minimum assessment of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00), Fifty Cents (50¢) for each One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or fraction thereof of assets in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). All money accruing from such assessment shall be used for the maintenance of the department.

The commissioner shall, during the month of January in each year, or as soon thereafter as practicable, prepare and send to each association a statement of the assessments due under this section, based upon the total assets of each association as of December 31 of the preceding year. The assessment shall be payable in accordance with the statement so furnished and shall be paid within ten (10) days after the date fixed for their payment. Such assessment shall constitute a lien on the assets of each association until paid. Any association failing to make payment of an installment within ten (10) days as provided in this section shall be liable for a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount in default for each day thereafter. All assessments and penalties provided in this section shall be payable as set forth in this section, and when collected by the commissioner shall be delivered to the State Treasurer to be placed to the credit of the account of the department.

If it appears to the commissioner that the fees assessed under this section shall produce more than the requirements of the estimated operating budget approved for the department for the ensuing assessment period, the commissioner shall authorize a uniform percentage reduction to be applied to the fees to be paid by the individual associations.

Associations organized and in existence as of June 30, 1994, shall not be billed or liable for the annual report assessment due for the close of this period only. The next annual report assessment shall be due based upon assets as of December 31, 1994, and annually thereafter.

Filing articles of merger when the resulting association is a state association, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application for conversion from a national association to a state association, a minimum fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) up to a maximum fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) as fixed by the commissioner.

Filing an application for a branch bank, branch office, or drive-in teller window, a minimum fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) up to a maximum fee of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), as fixed by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall publish a schedule of fees applicable to all associations within his jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 60; Laws, 1980, ch. 483; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 97; Laws, 1983, ch. 481; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 100; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 101; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 133; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 98; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 100, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-195.
Offering and sale of savings accounts exempt from securities regulations.

The offering and sale of savings accounts of any association subject to the provisions of this chapter are hereby exempted from all provisions of law of this state which provide for the supervision and regulation of the sale of securities, and the sale of any such accounts shall be legal without any action or approval whatsoever on the part of any official authorized to license, regulate and supervise the sale of securities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 61(1); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 98; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 101; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 102; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 134; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 99; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 101, eff from and after July 1, 2001.